Delaware, session 153, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4170A, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4170A. Electronic speed monitoring system [Expires June 30, 2028, pursuant to 84 Del. Laws, c. 74, Â§ 2]. (g) Civil penalties. â (1) The owner or operator of a vehicle who has failed to comply with the posted speed limit, as evidenced by information obtained from an electronic speed monitoring system, shall be is subject to a civil penalty consistent with those established under Â§ 4169(c) of this title. Assessments defined under Â§ 4105 of this title, Â§Â§ 4101 4101(d), (g), (h), and 9016 of Title 11 and Â§ 8505 of Title 10, shall may only be assessed for violations occurring in a âwork zoneâ as defined in subsection (b) of this section.